Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3402
Department of Correctional Services; powers.

The Department of Correctional Services is hereby authorized and directed to do all things necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the Compact in every particular.

Laws 1974, LB 697, § 2.